test/src/morphology/A-ceappat_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - čeäppat e-stem pöly: # Noun - full paradigm
     čeäppat+A+Sg+Nom: čeäppat
     čeäppat+A+Sg+Gen: čeäppat
     čeäppat+A+Sg+Acc: čeäppat
     čeäppat+A+Sg+Ill: čeäppta
     čeäppat+A+Sg+Loc: čeäpptest
     čeäppat+A+Sg+Com: čeäpptin
     čeäppat+A+Ess: čeäppten
     čeäppat+A+Par: čeäppted
     čeäppat+A+Sg+Abe: čeäppat-tää
     čeäppat+A+Pl+Nom: čeäppat
     čeäppat+A+Pl+Gen: čeäppti
     čeäppat+A+Pl+Acc: čeäpptid
     čeäppat+A+Pl+Ill: čeäpptid
     čeäppat+A+Pl+Loc: čeäpptin
     čeäppat+A+Pl+Com: čeäpptivuiˊm
     čeäppat+A+Pl+Abe: čeäpptitää
